Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 27 COLORADO SEED ACT
35-27-118. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner shall consider the severity of the violation, the amount of harm caused by such violation, the presence or absence of a pattern of similar violations by the registrant, the effect of the proposed penalty on the ability of the registrant to continue to conduct business, and any other factors deemed relevant.

The commissioner may request advice from the arbitration council in assessing a fine pursuant to this section.

The maximum penalty imposed by the commissioner shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars per violation.

No civil penalty shall be imposed unless the person charged is given notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect a civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of such civil penalty, the commissioner is authorized to retain the attorney general pursuant to section 35-27-116 to bring suit to recover such penalty. In any action brought pursuant to this section the commissioner shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorney fees.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1015, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-27-114 and 35-27-115 as they existed prior to 1993.

35-27-119. Embargo.

This section shall apply if the commissioner finds or has reasonable cause to believe that any seed is:

Adulterated or misbranded; or

Not labeled pursuant to this article; and

In violation of any provision of this article or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article;

From an unregistered seed labeler;

For sale or has been sold by an unregistered retail seed dealer; or

Has been distributed by an unregistered custom seed conditioner.

The commissioner shall conduct an investigation to determine if a violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) has occurred.

If paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section applies, the commissioner shall affix to the seed in question labeling to give notice that:

The seed violates this article; and

The seed is embargoed; and

No person may remove or dispose of such seed by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the commissioner or a court of competent jurisdiction.

If the commissioner determines that embargoed seed is not adulterated or mislabeled, the commissioner shall remove the labeling attached pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

The owner of seed embargoed under this section may correct any violation found by the commissioner within thirty days after the embargo of such seed. If the violation is not corrected within thirty days, the commissioner may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to condemn such seed.

If a court finds that embargoed seed is in violation of this article, such seed shall, after entry of such court's decree, be destroyed at the expense of the owner, claimant, or custodian thereof, under the supervision of the commissioner, and all court costs, attorney fees, storage fees, and other reasonable and proper expenses shall be assessed against the owner, claimant, or custodian of such seed.

If adulteration or mislabeling of embargoed seed may be corrected by proper conditioning or labeling, the court, after entry of such court's decree and if costs, attorney fees, storage fees, and expenses are paid and a good and sufficient bond is secured by the owner, claimant, or custodian of such seed, may order that such seed be delivered to the owner, claimant, or custodian for corrective labeling or conditioning. Any such corrective labeling or conditioning shall be conducted under the supervision of the commissioner. The expense of such supervision shall be paid by such owner, claimant, or custodian. The seed shall be returned to its owner, claimant, or custodian when the seed no longer violates this article and the expenses of such supervision have been paid. The commissioner shall inform the court of compliance by the owner, claimant, or custodian of the seed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1016, § 1, effective July 1.

35-27-120. Reports - bulletins.

Except as provided for in section 35-27-115 (4), the commissioner may publish bulletins or press reports setting forth results of any examination, analysis, or test conducted pursuant to this article. Bulletins may include the names of persons who have had seed lots examined, analyzed, or tested. The commissioner may also publish bulletins or press reports which set forth information on seed. Any such report or publications intended for circulation outside the executive branch shall be published and circulated in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1017, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-27-113 as it existed prior to 1993.

35-27-121. Advisory committee - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 190, § 7, effective March 31.

35-27-122. Arbitration council - procedures.

The commissioner shall appoint an arbitration council for each case composed of three members. The following shall each recommend one member:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 643, § 6, effective April 26, 2007.)

The dean of the college of agriculture, Colorado state university;

The president of the Colorado seedsmen's association; and

The president of any organization of farmers in the state as the commissioner determines to be appropriate.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 643, § 6, effective April 26, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 643, § 6, effective April 26, 2007.)

The council shall elect a chair from its membership. The chair shall conduct the deliberations of the council and shall direct all of its other activities. The commissioner shall serve as staff to the council and shall keep accurate records of all such deliberations and shall perform such other duties for the council as the chair directs.

The council shall conduct the arbitration for the case.

A buyer of seed shall request arbitration by filing a verified complaint with the commissioner together with a filing fee of ten dollars; except that the commissioner by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of the fee if necessary pursuant to section

24-75-402 (3)

, C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of the fee is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the commissioner by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of the fee as provided in section

24-75-402 (4)

, C.R.S. The commissioner shall serve a copy of the complaint upon the seller of such seed by certified mail or personal service.

Within five working days after receipt of a copy of the complaint, the seller shall file a verified answer to the complaint with the commissioner, who shall serve a copy of the answer upon the buyer by certified mail.

The commissioner shall investigate the allegations in the complaint. In conducting such investigation, the commissioner may employ the services of any expert that he or she deems appropriate. Upon completion of the investigation, the commissioner shall refer the complaint to the council along with a report of the results of the investigation.

Upon referral of a complaint for investigation, the council shall conduct an arbitration hearing in accordance with the uniform arbitration act, part 2 of article 22 of title 13, C.R.S., and shall report its findings and recommendations to the commissioner in an arbitration report. Such arbitration report shall be filed with the commissioner within sixty days after the conclusion of the arbitration hearing or a later date if the parties agree.

The arbitration report of the council shall include findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations as to costs, if any, including but not limited to costs of any investigation conducted by the commissioner.

In the course of his or her investigation, the commissioner may:

Examine the buyer, the seller, and any other person who may have relevant information;

Grow a representative sample of the seed through the facilities of Colorado state university to production; and

Conduct any other investigative activities that he or she deems necessary to obtain information relevant to the allegations in the complaint pursuant to his or her authority in section

35-27-115

.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 643, § 6, effective April 26, 2007.)

The members of the council shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses.

After the council has filed its arbitration report with the commissioner, the commissioner shall promptly transmit such arbitration report by certified mail to all parties.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1342, § 66, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(V), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) amended, p. 643, § 6, effective April 26.

35-27-123. Requirement and effect of arbitration.

If a buyer of seed suffers damage because such seed does not produce or perform in conformance with the labeling or warranty or because of negligence by the seller, the buyer shall submit such buyer's claim to arbitration pursuant to this section and section 35-27-122. Such submittal shall be a prerequisite to such buyer's right to maintain any legal action against the seller of such seed. Any statute of limitations shall be tolled until ten days after the filing of the arbitration report.

No claim may be asserted as a counterclaim or defense in any action brought pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) by a seller against a buyer, if the buyer has not submitted such claim to arbitration. After the buyer files a written notice of intention to assert a claim as a counterclaim or defense in such action, accompanied by a copy of the buyer's complaint filed under section 35-27-122 (2)(a), the statute of limitations shall be tolled for such claim until ten days after the filing of the arbitration report pursuant to section 35-27-122 (2)(d).

Every label required pursuant to section 35-27-105 shall include clear language that arbitration is required for claims arising out of the sale of seed; except that arbitration shall not be required if the notice required pursuant to this paragraph (a) is not included.

A notice in the following form or equivalent language shall be sufficient to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2):

UNDER THE "COLORADO SEED ACT", ARTICLE 27 OF TITLE 35, COLORADO REVISED STATUTES, ARBITRATION IS REQUIRED AS A PREREQUISITE TO CERTAIN LEGAL ACTIONS, COUNTERCLAIMS, OR DEFENSES AGAINST A SELLER OF SEED. INFORMATION ABOUT THIS REQUIREMENT MAY BE OBTAINED FROM THE COLORADO COMMISSIONER OF AGRICULTURE.

An arbitration report filed pursuant to section 35-27-122 (2)(d) shall be binding upon all parties to the extent agreed upon in any contract governing the sale which was the subject of the arbitration.

In the absence of an agreement to be bound by arbitration, a buyer may bring legal action against a seller or assert such claim as a counterclaim or defense in any action brought by the seller at any time after the arbitration report has been filed.

During litigation involving a complaint which has been arbitrated pursuant to this section, any party who was subject to such arbitration may introduce the arbitration report as evidence of the facts found in the report if the party against whom the report is offered was also subject to the arbitration. The court may give such weight to the council's findings and conclusions of law and recommendations as to damages and costs as the court sees fit based upon all the evidence before the court. The court may also take into account any finding of the arbitration council of any failure of any party to cooperate in such arbitration proceedings, including any finding as to the effect of delay in filing the arbitration claim or answer upon the ability of the arbitration council to determine the facts of the case.

NOTICE OF REQUIRED ARBITRATION

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1020, § 1, effective July 1.

35-27-124. Fees credited to plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

All fees and civil fines collected pursuant to this article 27 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3. The fees and fines imposed by this article 27 supplement any general fund appropriation appropriated for the purposes of this article 27.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 319, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1184), ch. 145, p. 630, § 4, effective June 29.

35-27-125. Repeal of article - review of functions.

This article 27 is repealed, effective September 1, 2031. Before the repeal, the registration functions of the commissioner are scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 190, § 8, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-116), ch. 62, p. 220, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1184), ch. 145, p. 628, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as 35-27-127 in Senate Bill 93-017 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.